Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-503
Museums; county or township; establishment; museum board; members; terms; vacancies, how filled; compensation.

When the electors of any county or of any township shall have voted to establish and maintain a museum, the county board of such county or the township board of such township shall appoint a museum board of not less than five but not more than nine members, no member of which shall be a member of the county or township board, the five members of the museum board first appointed shall hold office, one for a term of one year, one for a term of two years, one for a term of three years, one for a term of four years, and one for a term of five years, the sixth member shall be for a term of one year, the seventh for a term of two years, the eighth for a term of three years, and the ninth for a term of four years, from the first day of July following their appointment; and as the terms of the members expire, the county or township board shall appoint annually one trustee to serve for a term of five years. In case of vacancies, the county or township board shall have the power to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. No trustee shall receive any pay or compensation for any services rendered as a member of such board.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 3, p. 768;

Laws 1963, c. 306, § 2, p. 904;

Laws 1965, c. 316, § 2, p. 881.